Washington statutes.
RCW 43.157.005

Declaration.

The legislature declares that certain investments, such as investments for industrial development, environmental improvement, and innovation activities, merit special designation and treatment by governmental bodies when they are proposed. Such investments bolster the economies of their locale and impact the economy of the state as a whole. It is the intention of the legislature to recognize projects of statewide significance and to encourage local governments and state agencies to expedite their completion.

[ 2009 c 421 s 1; 1997 c 369 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 421: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 8, 2009]." [ 2009 c 421 s 11.]